Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.126

Emergency response system.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5004-S.SL) ***

School districts must work collaboratively with local law enforcement agencies and school security personnel to develop an emergency response system using evolving technology to expedite the response and arrival of law enforcement in the event of a threat or emergency at a school. School districts are encouraged to use the model policies developed by the school safety center in the office of the superintendent of public instruction as a resource. Each school district must submit a progress report on its implementation of an emergency response system as required under this section to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by December 1, 2014.

[ 2019 c 333 s 16; 2013 c 233 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 333: See note following RCW 28A.300.630.

Intent—2019 c 333: See note following RCW 28A.320.124.